src-fst-morphology-affixes-pronouns.lexc.md
# Prounoun inflection
This file documents `affixes/pronouns.lexc`,
the file on Livonian pronoun  inflection

**LEXICON PRON_ = goes to # only.

LEXICON PRON_MIS  mis:mi 1

LEXICON PRON_JEGĀ  jegā:jeʼgā 2

LEXICON PRON_MŪ  mū:m 3

LEXICON PRON_SE  se:s 4

LEXICON PRON_TÄMĀ  tämā: 5

LEXICON PRON_NE  ne:n 4 & 5

LEXICON PRON_MINĀ  6 ma:m

LEXICON PRON_MĒG  minā:m 6

LEXICON PRON_SINĀ  sinā:0 7

LEXICON PRON_TĒG  tēg:t 7

LEXICON PRON_KIS  kis:kī 8

LEXICON PRON_ĪʼŽ  9 īʼž:0

LEXICON PRON_MIDĀGÕD  midāgõd:midāg 10

LEXICON PRON_MITS  11 mits:mit

LEXICON PRON_SET  11b set:set

Stem lexica
LEXICON PRON_TUBĀ  tubā:tubā 19

LEXICON PRON_TUBĀ-PL  tubā:tubā 19

LEXICON PRON_ĀITA  āita:āita 46

LEXICON PRON_ĀIGAST  āigast: 140

LEXICON PRON_AZŪM-PL  azūm: 153

LEXICON PRON_VĪDÕZ  vīdõz: 163

LEXICON PRON_ĪKŠ  : 217

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-liv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc)</small>
